Hawaii statutes.
[PART II.
CHARTER TOUR OPERATORS]

[§468L-21] Charter tour operator
registration as travel agency required. (a) No person shall engage in the
business of a charter tour operator unless that person has registered as a
travel agency with the director under section 468L-2 and complies with the
provisions of this chapter applicable to a travel agency engaged in the
business of a charter tour operator.

(b) An application for registration of a
charter tour operator as a travel agency or for renewal of a registration of a
charter tour operator as a travel agency shall be made on a form provided by
the department. In addition to the information required to be provided by all
applicants for registration as a travel agency, the form shall require an
applicant for registration as a travel agency which intends to engage in the
business of a charter tour operator to:

(1) Provide evidence that a charter tour client trust
account has been established in accordance with sections 468L-5 and 468L-23;

(2) State whether the applicant intends to operate
seven or more charter tours during any twelve months or shorter period of the
registration period;

(3) State whether the applicant intends to operate
sixteen or more charter tours during any twelve months or shorter period of the
registration period; and

(4) Provide evidence that the applicant has complied
with the financial performance requirements of section 468L-22. [L 1999, c 258,
pt of §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next